Utah statutes.
53-10-206.   Collection of information.

The commissioner and persons designated by him may require all peace officers, the warden of the state prison, the keeper of any jail or correctional institution, or superintendent of the state hospital to obtain information that will aid in establishing the records required to be kept.

